Hawaii statutes.
[§340B-13] Reciprocity. (a) On or
after June 2, 1978, certification of operators by any state which, as
determined by the board, accepts certifications made or certification
requirements deemed satisfactory pursuant to this chapter, shall be accorded reciprocal
treatment and shall be recognized as valid and sufficient within the purview of
this chapter, if in the judgment of the board the certification requirements of
such state are substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter or
any rules or regulations adopted hereunder and providing further that
reciprocal privileges are granted to certified operators of this State.

(b) In making determinations pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the board may consider any generally applicable
criteria and guidelines developed by the association of boards of certification
for operating personnel in water and wastewater utilities. [L 1978, c 169, pt
of §2]

Revision Note

"June 2, 1978" substituted for "the
effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next